Washington statutes.
RCW 18.89.015

Unlawful practice, when.

After July 1, 1998, it shall be unlawful for a person to practice or to offer to practice as a respiratory care practitioner in this state or to use a title, sign, or device to indicate that such a person is practicing as a respiratory care practitioner unless the person has been duly licensed and registered under the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1997 c 334 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—1997 c 334: See note following RCW 18.89.010.